Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 6

Ineligibility for Employment on Public Contracts

12-4-601. Other state entities.

As used in this part, “other state entities” includes counties, cities, municipalities, and any other political subdivision of this state.

Acts 1981, ch. 393, § 1.

12-4-602. Prohibition on solicitation of government contracts by those convicted of certain offenses.

“Employment on any contract” means to perform services or provide materials to the state or subcontract to perform such services or provide such materials.

It is unlawful for the following persons and business organizations to solicit employment on any contract let by the state or by other state entities or any contract funded wholly or in part by the state or by other state entities, for a period of twenty-five (25) years from the date of such person's or organization's conviction, except as provided in §§ 12-4-605 and 12-4-606:

Persons, partnerships, joint ventures, firms or corporations who have pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or have been convicted of violations of the Sherman Antitrust Act (15 U.S.C. § 1), mail fraud (18 U.S.C. § 1341), or any other federal or state criminal statute in connection with any contract let or funded wholly or in part by the state of Tennessee or by other state entities or arising out of official investigation of such offenses;

Corporations, publicly or closely held, where any officer, director, shareholder active in management or employee holding a similar managerial position has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere or has been convicted of violations of the Sherman Antitrust Act, mail fraud, or any other federal or state criminal statute in connection with any contract let or funded wholly or in part by the state of Tennessee or by other state entities or arising out of official investigations of such offenses. This subdivision (b)(2) shall be applicable only where such officer, director, shareholder or employee committed such violation while acting as a representative of such corporation;

Corporations, publicly or closely held, where any officer, director, shareholder active in management or employee holding a similar managerial position has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere or has been convicted of violations of the Sherman Antitrust Act, mail fraud, or any other federal or state criminal statute in connection with any contract let or funded wholly or in part by the state of Tennessee or by other state entities or arising out of official investigations of such offenses, and where such corporations are formed subsequent to such plea or conviction;

Partnerships where any partner has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere or has been convicted of violations of the Sherman Antitrust Act, mail fraud, or any other federal or state criminal statute in connection with any contract let or funded wholly or in part by the state of Tennessee or by other state entities or arising out of official investigations of such offenses. This subdivision (b)(4) shall be applicable only where such partner committed such violation while acting as a representative of such partnership;

Partnerships where any partner has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere or has been convicted of violations of the Sherman Antitrust Act, mail fraud, or any other federal or state criminal statute in connection with any contract let or funded in whole or in part by the state of Tennessee or by other state entities or arising out of official investigations of such offenses, and where such partnerships are formed subsequent to such plea or conviction;

Joint ventures or other associations where any joint venturer, managing agent, person entitled to share in the proceeds and engaged in the active management thereof, or person holding a managerial position has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere or has been convicted of violations of the Sherman Antitrust Act, mail fraud, or any other federal or state criminal statute in connection with any contract let or funded wholly or in part by the state of Tennessee or by other state entities, or arising out of official investigation of such offenses. This subdivision (b)(6) shall be applicable only where such joint venturer, managing agent, person entitled to share in the proceeds, or person holding an executive position committed such violation while acting as a representative of such joint venture or association;

Joint ventures or other associations where any joint venturer, managing agent, person entitled to share in the proceeds and engaged in the active management thereof, or person holding a managerial position has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere or has been convicted of violations of the Sherman Antitrust Act, mail fraud, or any other federal or state criminal statute in connection with any contract let or funded wholly or in part by the state of Tennessee or by other state entities or arising out of official investigations of such offenses, and where such joint ventures or associations are formed subsequent to such plea or conviction; or

Succeeding or related corporations, partnerships, joint ventures, or other business organizations which have substantial factual or legal connections, continuity or identity with persons or organizations that have pleaded guilty or nolo contendere or have been convicted of violations of the Sherman Antitrust Act, mail fraud, or any other federal or state criminal statute in connection with any contract let or funded wholly or in part by the state or other state entities or arising out of official investigations of such offenses. Determination of factual or legal connection, continuity or identity under this subdivision (b)(8) shall be made by the attorney general and reporter upon request of the succeeding or related business organization.

Acts 1981, ch. 393, § 1.

12-4-603. Notification of governmental entities by attorney general and reporter.

It is the responsibility of the attorney general and reporter to timely notify those state departments, agencies and other entities involved in letting or funding state or other state entity contracts of those persons and business organizations ineligible to solicit employment on any contract let by the state or by other state entities or any contract funded wholly or in part by the state or by other state entities.

Acts 1981, ch. 393, § 1.

12-4-604. Intentional violation of part — Penalty.

An intentional violation of this part is a Class E felony.

Acts 1981, ch. 393, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 25.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

12-4-605. Applicability.

No person or business organization shall be prohibited by this part from soliciting employment on any contract let by the state or by other state entities or any contract funded wholly or in part by the state or by other state entities due to a conviction resulting from activities engaged in prior to May 22, 1981.

Acts 1981, ch. 393, § 1; 1989, ch. 366, § 4; 1991, ch. 114, § 1.

12-4-606. Exemptions.

The attorney general and reporter and the district attorneys general in their respective districts have the authority to grant exemptions from the prohibitions on soliciting employment on certain contracts enumerated herein to persons giving information to such officials in a criminal investigation or testifying in a state criminal trial in connection with any contract let or funded wholly or in part by the state or by other state entities or in a criminal trial arising out of official investigations of such offenses; provided, that such information or testimony results in a conviction. Such officials also have the authority to grant such exemptions to persons giving information to such officials in a civil investigation or testifying in a lawsuit brought by the state under the Sherman Antitrust Act (15 U.S.C. § 1), or title 47, chapter 25, in connection with any contract let or funded wholly or in part by the state or by other state entities; provided, that such information or testimony results in a monetary judgment for the state. Such exemptions may be total, limited to certain contracting agencies or departments, or limited in time.

Acts 1981, ch. 393, § 1.